Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1201
Act, how cited.

Sections 13-1201 to 13-1214 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Public Transportation Act.

Laws 1975, LB 443, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 19-3901;

Laws 1993, LB 158, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 575, § 1.